Utah statutes.
30-2-6.   Actions based on property rights.

Should the husband or wife obtain possession or control of property belonging to the other before or after marriage, the owner of the property may maintain an action therefor, or for any right growing out of the same, in the same manner and to the same extent as if they were unmarried.



No Change Since 1953

